New York, session 2025-2026, A1984.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Comprehensive climate change and sustainability education. 1. 4 The commissioner shall create and establish a comprehensive and accurate 5 climate change and sustainability curriculum which shall be taught in 6 grades kindergarten through twelve in all public and charter schools. 7 Such curriculum shall include instruction on how human activities cause 8 climate change, the effects of climate change, the dangers associated 9 with climate change and preventative measures that can be taken to alle- 10 viate the impacts of climate change. 11 2. The chancellor of the New York city school system, or a board of 12 education may adopt their own curriculum upon approval of the commis- 13 sioner, provided, however, that the commissioner shall not approve any 14 curriculum which does not substantially comply with the curriculum 15 created pursuant to subdivision one of this section. 16 3. Schools shall begin teaching the curriculum established pursuant to 17 this section in the first school year following certification by the 18 commissioner that such curriculum has been established. 19 4. School authorities shall provide the needed facilities, time and 20 place for the instruction set forth in this section and shall provide 21 learning aids and curriculum resource materials which contribute to 22 effective teaching methods and learning in education regarding climate 23 change and sustainability. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 25 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05418-01-5